Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-146.13
Department or agency; contact relative; release of information; condition.

(1) Upon determining the identity and location of the relative being sought, the department or agency shall attempt to contact the relative to determine such relative's willingness to be contacted by the adopted person.

(2) Information about the relative shall not be released to the adopted person by the department or agency unless such relative agrees to be contacted by the adopted person.

Laws 1988, LB 372, § 18;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 54;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 102.